src/orthography/inituppercase.regex
а (->) А, б (->) Б, в (->) В, г (->) Г, д (->) Д, е (->) Е, ё (->) Ё,
ж (->) Ж, з (->) З, и (->) И, й (->) Й, к (->) К, л (->) Л, м (->) М,
н (->) Н, о (->) О, п (->) П, р (->) Р, с (->) С, т (->) Т, у (->) У,
ф (->) Ф, х (->) Х, ц (->) Ц, ч (->) Ч, ш (->) Ш, щ (->) Щ, ъ (->) Ъ,
ы (->) Ы, ь (->) Ь, э (->) Э, ю (->) Ю, я (->) Я, ӈ (->) Ӈ, а̄ (->) А̄,
е̄ (->) Е̄, ӣ (->) Ӣ, о̄ (->) О̄, ӯ (->) Ӯ, ы̄ (->) Ы̄, э̄ (->) Э̄,
ю̄ (->) Ю̄, я̄ (->) Я̄, ё̄ (->) Ё̄  || .#. _ ;
